Illinois, session 104th, HB4217.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-4006 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-4006)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-4006)7    Sec. 3-4006. Duties of public defender. The public 8defender Public Defender, as directed by the court, shall act 9as attorney, without fee, before any court within any county 10for all persons who are held in custody or who are charged with 11the commission of any criminal offense, and who the court 12finds are unable to employ counsel.13    The public defender Public Defender shall be the attorney, 14without fee, when so appointed by the court under Section 1-5 15of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.16    In cases subject to Section 5-170 of the Juvenile Court 17Act of 1987 involving a minor who was under 15 years of age at 18the time of the commission of the offense, that occurs in a 19county with a full-time public defender office, a public 20defender, without fee or appointment, may represent and have 21access to a minor during a custodial interrogation. In cases 22subject to Section 5-170 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 23involving a minor who was under 15 years of age at the time of   HB4217 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16525 RTM 29921 b1the commission of the offense, that occurs in a county without 2a full-time public defender, the law enforcement agency 3conducting the custodial interrogation shall ensure that the 4minor is able to consult with an attorney who is under contract 5with the county to provide public defender services. 6Representation by the public defender shall terminate at the 7first court appearance if the court determines that the minor 8is not indigent.9    Every court shall, with the consent of the defendant and 10where the court finds that the rights of the defendant would be 11prejudiced by the appointment of the public defender, appoint 12counsel other than the public defender, except as otherwise 13provided in Section 113-3 of the "Code of Criminal Procedure 14of 1963". That counsel shall be compensated as is provided by 15law. He shall also, in the case of the conviction of any such 16person, prosecute any proceeding in review which in his 17judgment the interests of justice require.18    In counties with a population over 3,000,000, the public 19defender, without fee or appointment and with the concurrence 20of the county board, may act as attorney to noncitizens in 21immigration cases. Representation by the public defender in 22immigration cases shall be limited to those arising or being 23heard within the geographical boundaries of the county where 24the public defender has been appointed to office and to those 25of county residents with immigration cases outside of the 26county unless the board authorizes the public defender to   HB4217 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16525 RTM 29921 b1provide representation beyond those limits. 2    After the public defender has been appointed to represent 3a defendant in a criminal case, the public defender may choose 4to represent the client in a statutory summary suspension 5proceeding under Section 2-118.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code 6arising from the same arrest. This Section shall not be 7construed to establish a right to counsel in a statutory 8summary suspension proceeding under Section 2-118.1 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code. 10(Source: P.A. 104-225, eff. 8-15-25; revised 12-12-25.)